Utah statutes.
17C-2-101.   Resolution designating survey area  -- Request to adopt
resolution.
(1)  An agency board may begin the process of adopting an urban renewal
project area plan by adopting a resolution that:
(a)  designates an area located within the agency's boundaries as a survey
area;
(b)  contains a statement that the survey area requires study to determine
whether:
(i)  one or more urban renewal projects within the survey area are feasible;
and
(ii)  blight exists within the survey area; and
(c)  contains a description or map of the boundaries of the survey area.
(2) (a)  Any person or any group, association, corporation, or other entity
may submit a written request to the board to adopt a resolution under
Subsection (1).
(b)  A request under Subsection (2)(a) may include plans showing the urban
renewal proposed for an area within the agency's boundaries.
(c)  The board may, in its sole discretion, grant or deny a request under
Subsection (2)(a).
